Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2245
Action for compensation; conditions.

No person engaged in real property appraisal practice in this state or acting in the capacity of a real property appraiser in this state may bring or maintain any action in any court of this state to collect compensation for the performance of valuation services for which credentialing is required by the Real Property Appraiser Act without alleging and proving that he or she was duly credentialed under the act in this state at all times during the performance of such services.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 45;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 49;

Laws 2001, LB 162, § 37;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 65;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 65;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 35;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 86.